Connecticut, session 2026, HB05292.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (8) of section 12-412 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to sales occurring on or after
4 October 1, 2026):
5 (8) Sales of tangible personal property or services to any organization
6 that is exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(a) of the
7 Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding
8 internal revenue code of the United States, as from time to time
9 amended, and that the United States Treasury Department has
10 expressly determined, by letter, to be an organization that is described
11 in Section 501(c)(3), [or] (13) or (19) of said internal revenue code. At the
12 time of the sale that is exempt under this subsection, the organization
13 shall, in order to qualify for said exemption, do one of the following: (A)
HB5292 / File No. 136 1

HB5292 File No. 136
14 Present to the retailer (i) a copy of the United States Treasury
15 Department determination letter that was issued to such organization
16 and (ii) a certificate, in such form as the commissioner may prescribe,
17 certifying that a United States Treasury Department determination
18 letter has been issued to such organization and has not been revoked
19 and that the tangible personal property or services that are being
20 purchased from the retailer by such organization are to be used or
21 consumed exclusively for the purposes for which such organization was
22 established or (B) present to the retailer (i) a copy of the exemption
23 permit that was issued pursuant to this subsection by the commissioner
24 to such organization before July 1, 1995, after a determination of
25 eligibility by the commissioner and (ii) a certificate, in such form as the
26 commissioner may prescribe, certifying that an exemption permit was
27 issued pursuant to this subsection by the commissioner to such
28 organization before July 1, 1995, and was not revoked and that the
29 tangible personal property or services that are being purchased from the
30 retailer by such organization are to be used or consumed exclusively for
31 the purposes for which the organization was established. The
32 organization shall be liable for the tax otherwise imposed if such
33 tangible personal property or services are not used or consumed
34 exclusively for the purposes for which the organization was established.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and 12-412(8)
applicable to sales
occurring on or after
October 1, 2026
VA Joint Favorable
HB5292 / File No. 136 2

HB5292 File No. 136
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Revenue Serv., Dept. Various - 750,000 1 million
Revenue Loss
Note: Various=Various
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a revenue loss of $750,000 in FY 27 and $1 million
annually thereafter to the state by exempting the sales of tangible
personal property or services to certain federally tax-exempt veterans'
organizations. It is estimated that there are approximately 250 veterans'
organizations in the state that would qualify for this exemption.
By fund, the annualized revenue loss is anticipated to be $840,000 to
the General Fund and $80,000 each to the Special Transportation Fund
and the Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund.1
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
1 By statute, 0.5 percentage points of the 6.35% rate (or 7.87% of collections) is deposited
into the Special Transportation Fund and Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund each. The
remaining 5.35 percentage points (or 84.25% of collections) is deposited into the
General Fund.
HB5292 / File No. 136 3

HB5292 File No. 136
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5292
AN ACT EXEMPTING CERTAIN SALES TO MILITARY AND
VETERANS-RELATED ORGANIZATIONS FROM THE SALES AND
USE TAXES.